Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1504
Conduct prohibited.

No person shall engage in, aid, or abet any person in any conduct, fraudulent activity, or misrepresentation of the facts in violation of sections 48-1501 to 48-1503.

Laws 1984, LB 540, § 4.